es: Forma del mosquetón: En forma de D; HMS; D desplazado; Ovalado; Pera; Rectángulo; En forma de S; Triangular; Otros
ru: Форма карабина: D-образный; HMS; Смещение-D; Овальные; Грушевидный; Прямоугольный; S-образный; Треугольный; Другое
fi: Jousihaan muoto: D-muotoinen; HMS; Offset-D; Soikea; Päärynä; Suorakulmio; S-muotoinen; Kolmio; Muu
nl: Vorm karabijnhaak: D-vorm; HMS; Offset-D; Ovaal; Peer; Rechthoek; S-vormig; Triangel; Andere
fr: Forme du mousqueton: En forme de D; HMS; Offset-D; Oval; Poire; Rectangle; En forme de S; Triangle; Autre
de: Karabinerform: D-förmig; HMS; Mit D-Versatz; Oval; Birne; Rechteck; S-förmig; Dreieck; Sonstiges
en: Carabiner shape: D-shaped; HMS; Offset-D; Oval; Pear; Rectangle; S-shaped; Triangle; Other
ro-RO: Formă carabină: În formă de D; HMS; Offset-D; Ovală; Pară; Dreptunghiulară; În formă de S; Triunghiulară; Altele
vi: Hình dạng carabiner: Hình chữ D; HMS; Kiểu lệch D; Hình trái xoan; Lê; Chữ nhật; Hình chữ S; Hình tam giác; Khác
lt-LT: Karabino forma: D formos; HMS; „Offset-D“; Ovalus; Kriaušės; Stačiakampis; S formos; Trikampio formos kaušeliais; Kita
pt-BR: Formato de mosquetão: Em forma de D; HMS; Desvio D; Oval; Pera; Retângulo; Em forma de S; Triângulo; Outro
bg-BG: Форма на карабинера: D-образна; HMS; Offset-D; Овален; Круша; Правоъгълник; S-образен; Триъгълник; Други
sv: Form på karbinhake: D-formad; HMS; Offset-D; Oval; Päron; Rektangel; S-formad; Triangel; Annat
cs: Tvar karabiny: Tvar písmene D; HMS; Offset-D; Oválný; Hruška; Obdélník; Tvar písmene S; Trojúhelník; Jiné
pl: Kształt karabińczyka: w kształcie litery D; HMS; Przesunięcie D; Owalny; Gruszka; Prostokąt; Kształt litery S; Trójkąt; Pozostałe
hr-HR: Oblik karabinera: U obliku slova D; HMS; Nepravilni oblik slova D; Oval; Kruška; Pravokutnik; U obliku slova S; Trokutasti; Ostalo
tr: Karabina şekli: D şekilli; HMS; Telafi d; Oval; Armut; Dikdörtgen; S şekilli; Üçgen; Diğer
sl-SI: Oblika vponke: V obliki črke D; HMS; Posebna oblika D; Ovalno; Hruška; Pravokotna; V obliki črke S; Trikotna; Drugo
it: Forma a moschettone: A forma di D; HMS; Offset-D; Ovale; Pera; Rettangolo; A forma di S; Triangolo; Altro
hu: Karabiner zár alakja: D alakú; HMS; Ferde D alakú; Ovális; Körte alakú; Téglalap alakú; S alakú; Háromszög alakú; Egyéb
nb: Karabinkrokform: D-formet; HMS; Offset-D; Oval; Pære; Rektangel; S-formet; Trekant; Annen
ko: 카라비너 모양: D자형; HMS; 오프셋 D; 타원형; 배; 직사각형; S자형; 삼각; 기타
zh-CN: 登山扣形状: D 形; HMS; 偏移-D; 椭圆形; 梨; 长方形; S 形; 三角形; 其他
ja: カラビナ形状: D型; HMS; オフセットD; 楕円形; 洋梨; 長方形; S型; 三角形; その他
th: รูปร่างคาราบิเนอร์: รูปตัว D; HMS; ออฟเซ็ต D; รูปไข่; ทรงลูกแพร์; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; รูปตัว S; สามเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
el: Σχήμα καραμπίνερ: Σε σχήμα D; HMS; Offset-D; Οβάλ; Αχλάδι; Ορθογώνιο παραλληλόγραμμο; Σε σχήμα S; Τριγωνικό; Άλλο
da: Form på karabinhage: D-formet; HMS; Offset-D; Oval; Pære; Rektangel; S-formet; Trekant; Andet
pt-PT: Formato de mosquetão: Em forma de D; HMS; Desvio D; Oval; Pera; Retângulo; Em forma de S; Triângulo; Outro
sk-SK: Tvar karabíny: V tvare písmena D; HMS; Offset-D; Oválny; Hruškový; Obdĺžnik; V tvare písmena S; Trojuholník; Iné
zh-TW: 登山扣形狀: D 型; HMS; 偏移 D; 橢圓形; 梨形; 長方; S 型; 三角; 其他